Washington statutes.
RCW 39.89.060

Public notice—Notice to officials.

The local government shall:

(1) Publish notice in a legal newspaper of general circulation within the increment area that describes the public improvement, describes the boundaries of the increment area, and identifies the location and times where the ordinance and other public information concerning the public improvement may be inspected; and

(2) Deliver a certified copy of the ordinance to the county treasurer, the county assessor, and the governing body of each taxing district within which the increment area is located.

[ 2001 c 212 s 6.]